hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Futball: Futballtáskák és -hordozók; Futball-labdák; Futballsarokzászlók; Futballkesztyűk; Futballkapu-kiegészítők; Futballkapuk; Futball-védőfelszerelés; Futballcipők; Futball edzési segédeszközök
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal: Genți și saci pentru fotbal; Mingi de fotbal; Steaguri de colț pentru fotbal; Mănuși de fotbal; Accesorii pentru poarta de fotbal; Porți de fotbal; Echipamente de protecție pentru fotbal; Pantofi de fotbal; Articole pentru antrenament fotbal
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol: Bolsos y mochilas de fútbol; Balones de fútbol; Banderines de córner; Guantes de portero de fútbol; Accesorios para porterías de fútbol; Porterías de fútbol; Equipamiento de protección para fútbol; Calzado de fútbol; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de fútbol
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฟุตบอล: กระเป๋าและอุปกรณ์สำหรับพกพาฟุตบอล; ลูกบอล; ธงมุมสนามฟุตบอล; ถุงมือฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์ประตูฟุตบอล; ประตูฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของฟุตบอล; รองเท้าฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมฟุตบอล
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 축구: 축구 가방 및 캐리어; 축구공; 축구 코너 깃발; 축구 장갑; 축구 골대 부대용품; 축구 골대; 축구 보호 장비; 축구화; 축구 훈련 장비
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Futbal: Futbalové tašky a batohy; Futbalové lopty; Rohové vlajky pre futbal; Futbalové rukavice; Príslušenstvo pre futbalové bránky; Futbalové bránky; Futbalové ochranné pomôcky; Kopačky; Futbalové tréningové pomôcky
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Nogomet: Torbe i nosiljke za nogomet; Nogometne lopte; Nogometne korner zastavice; Nogometne rukavice; Pribor za nogometne golove; Nogometni golovi; Zaštitna oprema za nogomet; Nogometne tenisice; Pomagala za trening nogometa
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ποδόσφαιρο: Τσάντες και θήκες μεταφοράς ποδοσφαίρου; Μπάλες ποδοσφαίρου; Σημαίες κόρνερ ποδοσφαίρου; Γάντια ποδοσφαίρου; Αξεσουάρ τερμάτων ποδοσφαίρου; Τέρματα ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός ποδοσφαίρου; Παπούτσια ποδοσφαίρου; Βοηθήματα προπόνησης ποδοσφαίρου
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football: Sacs et housses de football; Ballons de football; Drapeaux de corner de football; Gants de football; Accessoires pour buts de football; Buts et filets de football; Protections de football; Chaussures de foot; Aides à l’entraînement au football
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol: Sacos e transportadores de futebol; Bolas de futebol; Bandeirolas de canto para futebol; Luvas de futebol; Acessórios para baliza de futebol; Balizas para futebol; Equipamento de proteção para futebol; Chuteiras de futebol; Auxiliares de treino para futebol
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Futbolas: Futbolo krepšiai ir nešyklės; Futbolo kamuoliai; Futbolo kampinės vėliavėlės; Futbolo pirštinės; Futbolo vartų priedai; Futbolo vartai; Futbolo apsauginės priemonės; Futbolo bateliai; Futbolo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 足球: 足球袋與攜行袋; 足球用球; 足球角旗; 足球手套; 足球球門配件; 足球球門; 足球護具; 足球鞋; 足球訓練輔助器材
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Futbol: Futbol çantaları ve taşıyıcıları; Futbol Topları; Futbol Korner Bayrakları; Futbol Eldivenleri; Futbol Kalesi Aksesuarları; Futbol Kaleleri; Futbol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Futbol Ayakkabıları; Futbol Eğitim Araçları
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Fußball: Fußballtaschen; Fußbälle; Fußball-Eckfahnen; Torwarthandschuhe; Zubehör für Fußballtore; Fußballtore & -netze; Fußball-Schutzkleidung; Fußballschuhe; Fußball-Trainingshilfen
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Fotball: Fotballbager og -bærere; Fotballer; Hjørneflagg for fotball; Fotballhansker; Målutstyr for fotball; Fotballmål; Beskyttelsesutstyr for fotball; Fotballsko; Treningsutstyr for fotball
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Piłka nożna: Torby i pokrowce piłkarskie; Piłki do gry w piłkę nożną; Chorągiewki narożne na boisko; Rękawice bramkarskie; Akcesoria do bramek do piłki nożnej; Bramki do piłki nożnej; Odzież ochronna do piłki nożnej; Buty do piłki nożnej; Pomoce treningowe do piłki nożnej
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng đá: Túi & túi đựng đồ bóng đá; Quả bóng đá; Cờ cắm ở góc sân bóng đá; Găng tay bóng đá; Phụ kiện cầu môn bóng đá; Khung thành; Thiết bị bảo vệ khi chơi bóng đá; Giày chơi bóng đá; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng đá
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Soccer: Soccer Bags & Carriers; Soccer Balls; Soccer Corner Flags; Soccer Gloves; Soccer Goal Accessories; Soccer Goals; Soccer Protective Gear; Soccer Shoes; Soccer Training Aids
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Calcio: Borse e zaini da calcio; Palloni da calcio; Bandierine per angoli; Guantoni da portiere da calcio; Accessori per porte per calcio; Porte e reti da calcio; Protezioni per calcio; Scarpe da calcio; Ausili per l'allenamento del calcio
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Fotboll: Fotbollsväskor och hållare; Fotbollar; Fotbollshörnflaggor; Fotbollshandskar; Tillbehör till fotbollsmål; Fotbollsmål; Skyddsutrustning för fotboll; Fotbollsskor; Träningshjälpmedel för fotboll
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Kopaná: Fotbalové tašky a vaky; Fotbalové míče; Rohové praporky; Brankářské rukavice; Potřeby pro fotbalové branky; Fotbalové branky a sítě; Fotbalové chrániče; Fotbalové boty (kopačky); Tréninkové pomůcky na fotbal
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Fodbold: Tasker og holdere til fodbold; Foldbolde; Fodbold – hjørneflag; Målmandshandsker; Fodboldmål – tilbehør; Fodboldmål; Beskyttelsesudstyr til fodbold; Fodboldstøvler; Hjælpemidler til fodboldtræning
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > サッカー: サッカーバッグ・キャリア; サッカーボール; サッカー用コーナーフラッグ; ゴールキーパー用グローブ; サッカーゴール関連用品; サッカーゴール; サッカー用プロテクター; サッカーシューズ; サッカー練習器具
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol: Bolsas e suportes de transporte de futebol; Bolas de futebol; Bandeirinhas de escanteio; Luvas do goleiro de futebol; Acessórios para traves de futebol; Redes e goleiras de futebol; Equipamento de proteção para futebol; Chuteiras de futebol; Acessórios de treinamento de futebol
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Voetbal: Voetbaltassen en -dragers; Voetballen; Hoekvlaggen; Keepershandschoenen; Accessoires voor voetbaldoelen; Voetbaldoelen en -netten; Beschermende uitrusting voor voetbal; Voetbalschoenen; Trainingshulpmiddelen voor voetbal
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Jalkapallo: Jalkapallokassit ja -reput; Jalkapallot (soccer); Jalkapallon kulmaliput; Jalkapallohanskat; Jalkapallomaalitarvikkeet; Jalkapallomaalit; Jalkapallosuojukset; Jalkapallokengät; Jalkapallon harjoitteluvälineet
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Nogomet: Torbe za nogomet; Nogometne žoge; Nogometne kotne zastavice; Vratarske nogometne rokavice; Dodatki za nogometne gole; Nogometni goli; Zaščitna oprema za nogomet; Kopačke; Pripomočki za vadbo nogometa
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Футбол: Футбольные сумки и переноски; Футбольные мячи; Футбольные угловые флажки; Футбольные вратарские перчатки; Аксессуары для футбольных ворот; Футбольные ворота; Защитная экипировка для футбола; Футбольные бутсы; Тренировочный инвентарь для футбола
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Футбол: Футболни чанти и сакове; Футболни топки; Флагове за ъгли за футбол; Футболни ръкавици; Аксесоари за футболни врати; Футболни врати; Защитна екипировка за футбол; Футболни обувки; Помощни средства за тренировка по футбол
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 足球用品: 足球包与收纳袋; 足球; 足球角旗; 足球守门员手套; 足球球门配件; 足球球门; 足球护具; 足球鞋; 足球训练辅助用品